Massachusetts, session 194th, H1491.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Effective April 10, 2019, DHCD launched the internet based, state-wide public housing
application and centralized waitlist system known as CHAMP to the public. This system was
mandated by the legislature as Section 14 of Chapter 235 of the Acts of 2014. The Eligibility and
Selection Criteria regulation, 760 CMR 5.00, has been updated to incorporate CHAMP.
760 CMR 5.05 (3) Determinations of Priority, Preference, Eligibility and Qualification;
(a) When an applicant approaches the top of a waiting list for an LHA program to which the
applicant has applied, the LHA shall make a final determination of the applicant's priority,
preference, eligibility and qualification.
of 2

Legislation that states CHAMP will revert back to local residents receiving priority over
applicants that have not been screened as emergency applicants. Applicants will no longer be
able to self-certify their emergency status.
of 2